Louisiana, session 2026, HB844.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:59(A)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:59(A)(6)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§59. Use of wireless telecommunications device prohibited; exceptions
A. Unless otherwise provided in this Subsection, all terms used in this
Section shall have the same meaning as defined in R.S. 32:1. As used in this
Section, the following terms shall apply:
* * *
(5) "School zone" means any designated area adjacent to a public or private
kindergarten through twelfth grade school or postsecondary institution, that is
properly marked with official school warning or similar traffic control signage,
including those provided in Chapter 7 of the Department of Transportation and
Development Traffic Engineering Manual relating to schools, and that extends not
less than two hundred fifty feet prior to the beginning of the school zone. A school
zone shall be in effect sixty minutes before school begins, sixty minutes after school
begins, sixty minutes before school ends, and sixty minutes after school ends.
(5) (6) "Wireless telecommunications device" means a cellular telephone,
a text-messaging device, a personal digital assistant, a stand-alone computer or other
electronic device, or any other substantially similar portable wireless device that is
readily removable from the vehicle and is used to write, send, or read text or data
through manual input. The term "wireless telecommunications device" shall not
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 844 ENROLLED
mean any device or component that is permanently affixed to a motor vehicle, or a
device used hands-free, citizens band radios, citizens band radio hybrids, commercial
two-way radio communications devices, two-way radio transmitters or receivers used
by licensees of the Federal Communications Commission in the Amateur Radio
Service, or electronic communication devices with a push-to-talk function.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.